Maryland, session 2025, HB1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1402.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to
the approval of the Department, a county board may establish one virtual school for the
elementary, middle, and high school grade bands.
(2) The Department may provide preliminary authorization to a county
board to establish one additional virtual school on a showing of just cause, as determined
by the Department.
(3) The Department may revoke approval of a virtual school if during the
previous school year the virtual school fails to meet the standards established by the
Department in regulation.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1373*

HOUSE BILL 1373
(4) (i) A county board may appeal a denial or revocation of approval for
the establishment of a virtual school to the State Board for adjudication during a public
hearing.
(ii) The State Board shall develop an appeals process to carry out the
provisions of this paragraph.
(b) A virtual school may not include classes for prekindergarten or kindergarten
students.
(c) A virtual school is subject to all applicable federal and State laws and
regulations governing the operation of a public school.
(d) Each approved virtual school shall have a unique school code assigned by the
Department.
(e) [(1)] A county board may [not] contract with a for–profit entity[, but may
contract with] OR a nonprofit entity[,] to operate or administer a virtual school for the
county board.
[(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be construed
to prohibit a county board from contracting with a for–profit entity for goods and services
for a virtual school.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.